Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB676.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of December 17, 1968 (P.L.1224, No.387), known as the Unfair Trade Practices and Consumer Protection Law, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 3.2. Unlawful Retention Policy.--(a) A business entity that makes automatic renewal offers or continuous service offers for goods or services to consumers shall do all of the following:(1) Provide an acknowledgment to a consumer. The acknowledgment shall disclose the automatic renewal offer terms or continuous service offer terms, the cancellation policy and information regarding how to cancel the goods or services in a 12345678910111213141516171819 manner that is capable of being retained by the consumer. If the automatic renewal offer or continuous service offer includes a free gift or trial, the acknowledgment shall include a clear and conspicuous explanation of the price that will be charged after the trial ends or the manner in which the pricing will change upon conclusion of the trial, disclose how to cancel the goods or services , provide the deadline by which the consumer must act to stop or prevent charges and allow the consumer to cancel the goods or services before the consumer pays for the goods or services.(2) Disclose the automatic renewal offer or continuous service offer to a consumer in a contract or a contract offer in a clear and conspicuous manner . (3) A llow a consumer who accepts the automatic renewal offer or a continuous service offer online to terminate the acceptance of the goods or services exclusively online . A business entity may allow a consumer who accepted an automatic renewal or continuous service offer to terminate the automatic renewal offer or continuous service offer under this clause by electronic mail formatted and provided by the business entity without additional information, or through a link to a website or other online service the consumer can use to cancel.(4) In the case of a material change in the terms of the automatic renewal offer or continuous service offer, provide a consumer with a clear and conspicuous notice of the material change and information regarding how to cancel the goods or services in a manner that is capable of being retained by the consumer.(5) Not intentionally misrepresent the terms of the automatic renewal offer or continuous service offer or any 20250SB0676PN0684 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 material fact related to the underlying good or service.(b) This section shall not apply to any of the following: (1) A business entity that is subject to the act of December 21, 1989 (P.L.672, No.87), known as the "Health Club Act."(2) A service provided by a business entity or its affiliate for which the business entity or its affiliate is regulated by the Federal Communications Commission, Federal Energy Regulatory Commission or Pennsylvania Public Utility Commission.(3) A contract subject to 66 Pa.C.S. Ch. 22 (relating to natural gas competition) or 28 (relating to restructuring of electric utility industry).(c) A violation of this section shall constitute unfair methods of competition and unfair or deceptive acts or practices and shall be subject to the enforcement provisions and private rights of action specified in this act.(d) As used in this section:"Clear and conspicuous" means, in reference to text, type larger than the surrounding text, or in contrasting type, font, or color to the surrounding text of the same size, or set off from the surrounding text of the same size by symbols or other marks, in a manner that clearly calls attention to the language."Consumer" means an individual who obtains or has obtained goods or services for use primarily for personal, family or household purposes.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0676PN0684 - 3 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425